District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.30

Repealed

Articles of incorporation.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 276, Pub. L. 87-569, § 30
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.30.
1981 Ed., § 29-530.
1973 Ed., § 29-1030.